src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiga	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaa	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutini	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCuterput	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtarput	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutersi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtarsi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaat	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaat	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutertik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtartik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-p	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutima	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutivit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitta	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatta	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutimik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtamik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-miit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaaniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminiit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaanni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtuut	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tuut	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaatut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimisut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaattut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaattut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutimittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtamittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtassinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
